test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vielmes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vielmes: # N_CONTR_ESA
    vielmes+N+Sg+Nom: vielmes
    vielmes+N+Sg+Gen: välbmá
    vielmes+N+Sg+Acc: välbmáv
    vielmes+N+Sg+Ill: välbmáj
    vielmes+N+Sg+Ine: välbmán
    vielmes+N+Sg+Ela: [välbmást, välbmás]
    vielmes+N+Sg+Com: välbmájn
    vielmes+N+Pl+Nom: välbmá
    vielmes+N+Pl+Gen: välbmáj
    vielmes+N+Pl+Acc: välbmájd
    vielmes+N+Pl+Ill: välbmájda
    vielmes+N+Pl+Ine: välbmájn
    vielmes+N+Pl+Ela: [välbmájst, välbmájs]
    vielmes+N+Pl+Com: [välbmáj, välbmájgum]
#    vielmes+N+Ess: vielmán # välbmán ?
#    vielmes+N+Abe: välbmádak
